California statutes. Public Resources Code
(3) The deadline or milestone will be missed but the project owner demonstrates a good faith effort to meet the project deadline or milestone.

(4) The deadline or milestone will be missed due to unforeseen natural disasters or acts of God that prevent timely completion of the project deadline or milestone.

(5) The deadline or milestone will be missed for any other reason determined reasonable by the commission.

(f) The commission shall extend the start-of-construction deadline required by paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) by an additional 24 months, if the owner reimburses the commission’s actual cost of licensing the project, less the amount paid pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 25806. For the purposes of this section, the commission’s actual cost of licensing the project shall be based on a certified audit report filed by the commission staff within 180 days of the commission’s certification of the project. The certified audit shall be filed and served on all parties to the proceeding, is subject to public review and comment, and is subject to at least one public hearing if requested by the project owner. Any reimbursement received by the commission pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited in the General Fund.

(g) If the owner of a project subject to the start-of-construction deadline provided by paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) fails to commence construction, without good cause, within 12 months after the project has been certified by the commission and has not received an extension pursuant to subdivision (f), the commission shall provide immediate notice to the California Consumer Power and Conservation Financing Authority. The authority shall evaluate whether to pursue the project independently or in conjunction with any other public or private entity, including the original certificate holder. If the authority demonstrates to the commission that it is willing and able to construct the project either independently or in conjunction with any other public or private entity, including the original certificate holder, the commission may revoke the original certification and issue a new certification for the project to the authority, unless the authority’s statutory authorization to finance or approve new programs, enterprises, or projects has expired. If the authority declines to pursue the project, the permit shall remain with the current project owner until it expires pursuant to the regulations adopted by the commission.

(h) If the commission issues a new certification for a project subject to the start-of-construction deadline provided by paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) to the authority, the commission shall adopt new milestones for the project that allow the authority up to 24 months to start construction of the project or to start to meet the applicable deadlines or milestones. If the authority fails to begin construction in conformity with the deadlines or milestones adopted by the commission, without good cause, the certification may be revoked.

(i) (1) If the commission issues a new certification for a project subject to the start-of-construction deadline provided by paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) to the authority and the authority pursues the project without participation of the original certificate holder, the authority shall offer to reimburse the original certificate holder for the actual costs the original certificate holder incurred in permitting the project and in procuring assets associated with the license, including, but not limited to, major equipment and the emission offsets. In order to receive reimbursement, the original certificate holder shall provide to the commission documentation of the actual costs incurred in permitting the project. The commission shall validate those costs. The certificate holder may refuse to accept the offer of reimbursement for any asset associated with the license and retain the asset. To the extent the certificate holder chooses to accept the offer for an asset, it shall provide the authority with the asset.

(2) If the authority reimburses the original certificate holder for the costs described in paragraph (1), the original certificate holder shall provide the authority with all of the assets for which the original certificate holder received reimbursement.

(j) This section does not prevent a certificate holder from selling its license to construct and operate a project prior to its revocation by the commission. In the event of a sale to an entity that is not an affiliate of the certificate holder, the commission shall adopt new deadlines or milestones for the project that allow the new certificate holder up to 12 months to start construction of the project or to start to meet the applicable deadlines or milestones.

(k) Paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) and subdivisions (c) to (j), inclusive, do not apply to licenses issued for the modernization, repowering, replacement, or refurbishment of existing facilities or to a qualifying small power production facility or a qualifying cogeneration facility within the meaning of Sections 201 and 210 of Title II of the federal Public Utility Regulatory Policies Act of 1978 (16 U.S.C. Secs. 796(17), 796(18), and 824a-3), and the regulations adopted pursuant to those sections by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (18 C.F.R. Parts 292.101 to 292.602, inclusive), nor shall those provisions apply to any other generation units installed, operated, and maintained at a customer site exclusively to serve that facility’s load. For the purposes of this subdivision, “replacement” of an existing facility includes, but is not limited to, a comparable project at a location different than the facility being replaced, provided that the commission certifies that the new project will result in the decommissioning of the existing facility.

(l) Paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) and subdivisions (c) to (j), inclusive, do not apply to licenses issued to “local publicly owned electric utilities,” as defined in Section 224.3 of the Public Utilities Code, whose governing bodies certify to the commission that the project is needed to meet the projected native load of the local publicly owned utility.

(m) To implement this section, the commission and the California Consumer Power and Conservation Financing Authority may, in consultation with each other, adopt emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. For purposes of that chapter, including, without limitation, Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of the regulations shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 558, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25534.1.

(a) The executive director of the commission may issue a complaint to any person or entity on whom an administrative civil penalty may be imposed pursuant to Section 25534. The complaint shall allege the act or failure to act for which the civil penalty is proposed, the provision of law authorizing civil liability, and the proposed civil penalty.

(b) The complaint shall be served by personal notice or certified mail, and shall inform the party so served that a hearing will be conducted within 60 days after the party has been served. The hearing shall be before the commission. The complainant may waive the right to a hearing, in which case the commission shall not conduct a hearing.

(c) After any hearing, the commission may adopt, with or without revision, the proposed decision and order of the executive director.

(d) Orders setting an administrative civil penalty shall become effective and final upon issuance thereof, and any payment shall be made within 30 days. Copies of these orders shall be served by personal service or by registered mail upon the party served with the complaint and upon other persons who appeared at the hearing and requested a copy.

(e) In determining the amount of the administrative civil penalty, the commission shall take into consideration the nature, circumstance, extent, and gravity of the violation or violations, whether the violation is susceptible to removal or resolution, the cost to the state in pursuing the enforcement action, and with respect to the violator, the ability to pay, the effect on ability to continue in business, any voluntary removal or resolution efforts undertaken, any prior history of violations, the degree of culpability, economic savings, if any, resulting from the violation, and such other matters as justice may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1079, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

25534.2.

(a) Within 30 days after service of an order issued under Section 25534.1, any aggrieved party may file with the superior court a petition for writ of mandate for review thereof pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure. If no aggrieved party petition for a writ of mandate is filed within the time provided by this section, an order of the commission is not subject to review by any court or agency, except that the commission may grant review on its own motion of an order issued under Section 25534.1 after the expiration of the time limits set by this section.

(b) Upon request of the commission, the Attorney General shall institute an action in the appropriate superior court to collect and recover any administrative civil penalties imposed pursuant to Section 25534.1. The court shall accord priority on its calendar to any action under this subdivision.

(c) Any moneys recovered by the commission pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1079, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

25535.

Such reasonable and direct costs as the applicant incurs to comply with the provisions of this chapter shall be allowed for ratemaking purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1090.)
-------------------------------------------

25537.

Upon approval of an application, the commission shall forward to the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission, the Environmental Protection Agency, and to other appropriate federal agencies, the results of its studies including the environmental impact report on the facility, the written decision on the facility contained in the application, and the commission’s determination of facility safety and reliability as provided in Section 25511.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1114.)
-------------------------------------------

25538.

Upon receiving the commission’s request for review under subdivision (f) of Section 25519 and Section 25506, the local agency may request a fee from the commission to reimburse the local agency for the actual and added costs of this review by the local agency. The commission shall reimburse the local agency for the added costs that shall be actually incurred by the local agency in complying with the commission’s request. The local agency may also request reimbursement for permit fees that the local agency would receive but for the operation of Section 25500, provided, however, that such fees may only be requested in accordance with actual services performed by the local agency. The commission shall either request a fee from the person proposing the project or devote a special fund in its budget, for the reimbursement of such costs incurred by local agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1028, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

25539.

In reviewing notices and applications for certification of modifications of existing facilities, the commission shall adopt rules and regulations as necessary to insure that relevant duties pursuant to this division are carried out.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25540.

If a person proposes to construct a geothermal powerplant and related facility or facilities on a site, the commission shall not require three alternative sites and related facilities to be proposed in the notice. Except as otherwise provided, the commission shall issue its findings on the notice, as specified in Section 25514, within nine months from the date of filing of such notice, and shall issue its final decision on the application, as specified in Section 25523, within nine months from the date of the filing of the application for certification, or at such later time as is mutually agreed to by the commission and the applicant or person submitting the notice or application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1091.)
-------------------------------------------

25540.1.

The commission shall determine, within 30 days after the receipt of a notice or application for a geothermal powerplant, whether the notice or application is complete. If the notice or application is determined not to be complete, the commission’s determination shall specify, in writing, those parts of the notice or application which are incomplete and shall indicate the manner in which it can be made complete. Within 30 days after receipt of the applicant’s filing with the commission the additional information requested by the commission to make the notice or application complete, the commission shall determine whether the subsequent filing is sufficient to complete the notice or application. A notice or application shall be deemed filed for purposes of Section 25540 on the date the commission determines the notice or application is completed if the commission has adopted regulations specifying the informational requirements for a complete notice or application, but if the commission has not adopted regulations, the notice or application shall be deemed filed on the last date the commission receives any additional data that completes the notice or application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 335, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

25540.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

(a) If an applicant proposes to construct a geothermal powerplant at a site which, at the outset of the proceeding, the applicant can reasonably demonstrate to be capable of providing geothermal resources in commercial quantities, no notice of intention pursuant to Section 25502 shall be required, and the commission shall issue the final decision on the application, as specified in Section 25523, within 12 months after acceptance of the application for certification of a geothermal powerplant and related facilities, or at such later time as is mutually agreed by the commission and the applicant.

(b) Upon receipt of an application for certification of a geothermal powerplant and related facilities, the commission shall transmit a copy of the application to every state and local agency having jurisdiction over land use in the area involved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1091.)
-------------------------------------------

25540.3.

(a) An applicant for a geothermal powerplant may propose a site to be approved that will accommodate a potential maximum electric generating capacity in excess of the capacity being proposed for initial construction. In addition to the information concerning the initial powerplant and related facilities proposed for construction required pursuant to Section 25520, such application shall include all of the following, to the extent known:

(1) The number, type, and energy source of electric generating units which the site is proposed ultimately to accommodate and the maximum generating capacity for each unit.

(2) The projected installation schedule for each unit.

(3) The impact of the site, when fully developed, on the environment and public health and safety.

(4) The amount and sources of cooling water needed at the fully developed site.

(5) The general location and design of auxiliary facilities planned for each stage of development, including, but not limited to pipelines, transmission lines, waste storage and disposal facilites, switchyards, and cooling ponds, lakes, or towers.

(6) Such other information relating to the design, operation, and siting of the facility as the commission may by regulation require.

(b) If an application is filed pursuant to subdivision (a) which proposes a site to be approved which will accommodate a potential maximum electric generating capacity in excess of the capacity being proposed for initial construction, the commission may, in its decision pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 25540.3, either certify only the initial facility or facilities proposed for initial construction or may certify the initial facility or facilities and find the site acceptable for additional generating capacity of the type tentatively proposed. The maximum allowable amount and type of such additional capacity shall be determined by the commission.

If the decision includes a finding that a particular site is suitable to accommodate a particular additional generating capacity, the site shall be designated a potential multiple facility site. The commission may, in determining the acceptability of a potential multiple facility site, specify conditions or criteria necessary to ensure that future additional facilities will not exceed the limitations of the site.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1271.)
-------------------------------------------

25540.4.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

(a) The decision of the commission on an application for an additional facility at a potential multiple facility site shall be issued within three months after the acceptance of the application or at such later time as is mutually agreed upon by the commission and the applicant.

(b) In reviewing an application for an additional facility at a potential multiple facility site, the commission may, upon a showing of good cause, undertake a reconsideration of its prior determinations in the final report for the site pursuant to Section 25514 or its decision pursuant to Section 25523 based on current conditions and other reasonable alternatives to the proposed facility. Such reconsideration must be completed within seven months after acceptance of such application for an additional facility.

(c) The commission shall, pursuant to Section 21100.2, provide by resolution or order for completing and certifying the environmental impact report within the time limits established by subdivisions (a) and (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1271.)
-------------------------------------------

25540.5.

The commission may, at the petition of a county which has adopted a geothermal element for its general plan, approve an equivalent certification program which delegates to that county full authority for the certification of all geothermal powerplants within such county. Once approved by the commission, the equivalent certification program shall replace and supersede the procedures for certification of all geothermal powerplants and related facilities, pursuant to Sections 25540 to 25540.4, inclusive, to be located within such county. The commission may, after public hearings, revoke the approved equivalent certification program of such county if the commission finds that the program does not comply with current commission certification requirements. The equivalent certification program shall include, but not be limited to, provisions for all of the following:

(a) Certification of geothermal areas as potential multiple facility sites, if so applied for.

(b) Processing of applications in less than 12 months.

(c) Periodic review and updating of the program by the county as may be required by law and the commission.

(d) Appeal procedures, including appeals to the commission on substantive issues. In any such appeal on a substantive issue, the commission shall determine whether the act or decision is supported by substantial evidence in the light of the whole record. The commission shall determine, within 15 days of receipt of an appeal, whether the appeal has merit and whether action should be taken.

(e) Input and review by other relevant public agencies and members of the public.

(f) Public hearing procedures equivalent to those specified in Article 6 (commencing with Section 65350) of Chapter 3 of Title 7 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1271.)
-------------------------------------------

25540.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no notice of intention is required, and the commission shall issue its final decision on the application, as specified in Section 25523, within 12 months after the filing of the application for certification of the powerplant and related facility or facilities, or at any later time as is mutually agreed by the commission and the applicant, for any of the following:

(1) A thermal powerplant which will employ cogeneration technology, a thermal powerplant that will employ natural gas-fired technology, or a solar thermal powerplant.

(2) A modification of an existing facility.

(3) A thermal powerplant which it is only technologically or economically feasible to site at or near the energy source.

(4) A thermal powerplant with a generating capacity of up to 100 megawatts.

(5) A thermal powerplant designed to develop or demonstrate technologies which have not previously been built or operated on a commercial scale. Such a research, development, or commercial demonstration project may include, but is not limited to, the use of renewable or alternative fuels, improvements in energy conversion efficiency, or the use of advanced pollution control systems. Such a facility may not exceed 300 megawatts unless the commission, by regulation, authorizes a greater capacity. Section 25524 does not apply to such a powerplant and related facility or facilities.

(b) Projects exempted from the notice of intention requirement pursuant to paragraph (1), (4), or (5) of subdivision (a) shall include, in the application for certification, a discussion of the applicant’s site selection criteria, any alternative sites that the applicant considered for the project, and the reasons why the applicant chose the proposed site. That discussion shall not be required for cogeneration projects at existing industrial sites. The commission may also accept an application for a noncogeneration project at an existing industrial site without requiring a discussion of site alternatives if the commission finds that the project has a strong relationship to the existing industrial site and that it is therefore reasonable not to analyze alternative sites for the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 581, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

25541.

The commission may exempt from this chapter thermal powerplants with a generating capacity of up to 100 megawatts and modifications to existing generating facilities that do not add capacity in excess of 100 megawatts, if the commission finds that no substantial adverse impact on the environment or energy resources will result from the construction or operation of the proposed facility or from the modifications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 581, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

25541.1.

It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage the development of thermal powerplants using resource recovery (waste-to-energy) technology. Previously enacted incentives for the production of electrical energy from nonfossil fuels in commercially scaled projects have failed to produce the desired results. At the same time, the state faces a growing problem in the environmentally safe disposal of its solid waste. The creation of electricity by a thermal powerplant using resource recovery technology addresses both problems by doing all of the following:

(a) Generating electricity from a nonfossil fuel of an ample, growing supply. 

(b) Conserving landfill space, thus reducing waste disposal costs.

(c) Avoiding the health hazards of burying garbage.

Furthermore, development of resource recovery facilities creates new construction jobs, as well as ongoing operating jobs, in the communities in which they are located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 743, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

25541.5.

(a) On or before January 1, 2001, the Secretary of the Resources Agency shall review the regulatory program conducted pursuant to this chapter that was certified pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 15251 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, to determine whether the regulatory program meets the criteria specified in Section 21080.5. If the Secretary of the Resources Agency determines that the regulatory program meets those criteria, the secretary shall continue the certification of the regulatory program.

(b) If the Secretary of the Resources Agency continues the certification of the regulatory program, the commission shall amend the regulatory program from time to time, as necessary to permit the secretary to continue to certify the program.

(c) This section does not invalidate the certification of the regulatory program, as it existed on January 1, 2000, pending the review required by subdivision (a).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 581, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

25542.

In the case of any site and related facility or facilities for which the provisions of this division do not apply, the exclusive power given to the commission pursuant to Section 25500 to certify sites and related facilities shall not be in effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25543.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to improve the process of siting and licensing new thermal electric powerplants to ensure that these facilities can be sited in a timely manner, while protecting environmental quality and public participation in the siting process.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7550.5 of the Government Code, the commission shall prepare a report to the Governor and the Legislature on or before March 31, 2000, that identifies administrative and statutory measures that, preserving environmental protections and public participation, would improve the commission’s siting and licensing process for thermal powerplants of 50 megawatts and larger. The report shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) An examination of potential process efficiencies associated with required hearings, site visits, and documents.

(2) A review of the impacts on both process efficiency and public participation of restrictions on communications between applicants, the public, and staff or decisionmakers.

(3) An assessment of means for improving coordination with the licensing activities of local jurisdictions and participation by other state agencies.

(4) An assessment of organizational structure issues including the adequacy of the amounts and organization of current technical and legal resources.

(5) Recommendations for administrative and statutory measures to improve the siting and licensing process.

(c) The commission may immediately implement any administrative recommendations. Regulations, as identified in paragraph (5), adopted within 180 days of the effective date of this section may be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of the Government Code. For purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of the regulations shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, and general welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 581, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6.2. Certification of Nonfossil-Fueled Powerplants, Energy Storage Facilities, and Related Facilities [25545. - 25545.19.]

25545.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “California Native American tribe” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 21073.

(b) “Facility” means any of the following:

(1) A solar photovoltaic or terrestrial wind electrical generating powerplant with a generating capacity of 50 megawatts or more and any facilities appurtenant thereto.

(2) An energy storage system as defined in Section 2835 of the Public Utilities Code that is capable of storing 200 megawatthours or more of energy.

(3) A stationary electrical generating powerplant using any source of thermal energy, with a generating capacity of 50 megawatts or more, excluding any powerplant that burns, uses, or relies on fossil or nuclear fuels.

(4) A discretionary project as described in Section 21080 for which the applicant has certified that a capital investment of at least two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) will be made over a period of five years and the discretionary project is for (A) the manufacture, production, or assembly of an energy storage system or component manufacturing, wind system or component manufacturing, and solar photovoltaic energy system or component manufacturing, or (B) the manufacture, production, or assembly of specialized products, components, or systems that are
 integral to renewable energy or energy storage technologies.

(5) An electrical transmission line carrying electricity from a facility described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) that is located in the state to a point of junction with any interconnected electrical transmission system.

(6) A hydrogen production facility and associated onsite storage and processing facilities that do not derive hydrogen from a fossil fuel feedstock and that receive funding from any of the following:

(A) The Hydrogen Program established pursuant to Section 25664.1.

(B) Section 91530, as added by the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Bond Act
 of 2024.

(C) The Alliance for Renewable Clean Hydrogen Energy Systems (ARCHES) authorized by Article 15 (commencing with Section 12100.160) of Chapter 1.6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, as awarded by the United States Department of Energy Office of Clean Energy Demonstrations.

(7) A geothermal powerplant or a project that comprises multiple geothermal powerplants on a single site.

(c) “Site” means any location on which an eligible facility is constructed or is proposed to be constructed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 372, Sec. 1.   (AB 531)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

25545.1.

(a) A person proposing an eligible facility may file an application no later than June 30, 2030, for certification with the commission to certify a site and related facility in accordance with this chapter, including a person who has an application for certification or small powerplant exemption filed with the commission pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 25500) pending as of June 30, 2022. Upon receipt of the application, the commission shall have the exclusive power to certify the site and related facility, whether the application proposes a new site and related facility or a change or addition to an existing facility. This section does not modify the Public Utilities Commission’s jurisdiction, including the issuance of a certificate of public convenience and necessity under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1001) of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code for a facility that is proposed by a utility
 regulated by the Public Utilities Commission.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the issuance of a certificate by the commission for a site and related facility pursuant to this chapter shall be in lieu of any permit, certificate, or similar document required by any state, local, or regional agency, or federal agency to the extent permitted by federal law, for the use of the site and related facilities, and shall supersede any applicable statute, ordinance, or regulation of any state, local, or regional agency, or federal agency to the extent permitted by federal law.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not supersede the authority of the State Lands Commission to require leases and receive lease revenues, if applicable, or the authority of the California Coastal Commission, the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, the State Water Resources
 Control Board, or the applicable regional water quality control boards.

(3) For facilities described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 25545, this subdivision does not supersede the authority of local air quality management districts or the Department of Toxic Substances Control.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that this section addresses a matter of statewide concern rather than a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, this section applies to all cities, including charter cities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 18.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25545.2.

An application for a site and related facility submitted pursuant to this chapter shall be in a form prescribed by the commission and shall contain all of the information required by Section 25520 and be further supported by other information as the commission may require, including, but not limited to, the informational requirements in Section 1877 of Title 20 of the California Code of Regulations, to support the preparation of an environmental impact report, mitigated negative declaration, or negative declaration and issuance of a certification. The application shall include evidence that the applicant has sufficient real property rights to the proposed location to currently access, build, and operate the proposed facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 19.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25545.3.

For purposes of sections 25545.3.3 and 25545.3.5, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Construction” includes any new construction work and subsequent construction work following initial completion that is contracted out to a contractor in the construction industry.

(b) “Covered project” or “project” means a site and related facility subject to an application submitted under
 this chapter.

(c) “Project labor agreement” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.

(d) “Skilled and trained workforce” has the same meaning as provided in Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 61, Sec. 4.   (AB 205)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25545.3.3.

An application for a covered project submitted under this chapter shall include the applicant’s certification that it will meet the requirements of a covered project and the commission shall make the requirements a condition of certification. The application shall also include the applicant’s certification that either of the following is true:

(a) The entirety of the construction of the covered project is a public work for purposes of
 Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(b) The construction of the covered project is not in its entirety a public work for which prevailing wages must be paid under Article 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Chapter 1 of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code, but all construction workers employed on the project will be paid at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages for the type of work and geographic area, as determined by the Director of Industrial Relations pursuant to Sections 1773 and 1773.9 of the Labor Code, except that apprentices registered in programs approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards may be paid at least the applicable apprentice prevailing rate. If the project is subject to this subdivision, for those portions of the project that are not a public work, all of the following shall apply:

(1) The applicant shall ensure that the prevailing wage requirement is included in all contracts for the performance of all construction work.

(2) All contractors and subcontractors shall pay to all construction workers employed in the construction of the project at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages, except that apprentices registered in programs approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards may be paid at least the applicable apprentice prevailing rate.

(3) All contractors and subcontractors performing construction work on the project shall employ apprentices at no less than the ratio required in Section 1777.5 of the Labor Code.

(4) Except as provided in paragraph (6), all contractors and subcontractors performing
 construction work shall maintain and verify payroll records pursuant to Section 1776 of the Labor Code, make those records available for inspection and copying as provided therein, and furnish those payroll records to the Labor Commissioner pursuant to Section 1771.4 of the Labor Code.

(5) Except as provided in paragraph (6), the obligation of the contractors and subcontractors to pay prevailing wages and employ apprentices may be enforced by the Labor Commissioner through the issuance of a civil wage and penalty assessment pursuant to Section 1741 of the Labor Code, which may be reviewed pursuant to Section 1742 of the Labor Code, within 18 months after the completion of the project, or by an underpaid worker through an administrative complaint or civil action, or by a joint labor-management committee though a civil action under Section 1771.2 of the Labor Code. If a civil wage and penalty assessment is issued, the contractor, subcontractor,
 and surety on a bond or bonds issued to secure the payment of wages covered by the assessment shall be liable for liquidated damages pursuant to Section 1742.1 of the Labor Code.

(6) Paragraphs (4) and (5) do not apply if all contractors and subcontractors performing construction work on the project are subject to a project labor agreement. The project labor agreement shall also include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Provisions requiring payment of prevailing wages to all construction workers employed in the construction of the project and for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure.

(B) Targeted hiring provisions, including a targeted hiring plan, on a craft-by-craft basis to address job access for local, disadvantaged, or underrepresented workers, as defined by a relevant
 local agency.

(C) Apprenticeship utilization provisions that commit all parties to increasing the share of work performed by state-registered apprentices above the state-mandated minimum ratio required in Section 1777.5 of the Labor Code.

(D) Apprenticeship utilization provisions that commit all parties to hiring and retaining a certain percentage of state-registered apprentices that have completed the Multi-Craft Core preapprenticeship training curriculum referenced in subdivision (t) of Section 14005 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 61, Sec. 4.   (AB 205)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25545.3.5.

An application for a covered project submitted under this chapter shall include the applicant’s certification that a skilled and trained workforce will be used to perform all construction work on the project and all of the following apply:
